Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 (1) As used in  this section, “public employer” has the meaning given that
term in ORS 243.650.
(2) Whenever a public employer’s employment policies provide for a pay  differential for
a public employee’s use of bilingual or multilingual skills in performing assigned duties, the
policies must provide for, in the same manner as would be provided  for the use of any other
bilingual or multilingual skills,  a pay differential for an employee’s use of American Sign
Language in performing assigned duties.
Passed by Senate February 18, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 731 (SB 731-INTRO) Page 1